Florida, session 2026, SB1160.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSection 11.92, Florida Statutes, is created to 35 read: 36 11.92âOffice of the Corrections Ombudsman.â 37 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the protection of the 38 health, safety, welfare, and rights of persons who are 39 incarcerated within the state correctional system is a matter of 40 urgent public concern. Current law does not provide adequate and 41 independent oversight of the Department of Corrections to ensure 42 accountability, monitor conditions of confinement, and 43 investigate complaints. It is appropriate and necessary to 44 create an independent entity as a unit of the legislative branch 45 of state government in order to restore public trust in the 46 department. 47 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 48 (a)ââCommitteeâ means the Corrections Oversight Committee. 49 (b)ââCorrectional facilityâ means a state correctional 50 institution or contractor-operated correctional facility. 51 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Corrections. 52 (d)ââOfficeâ means the Office of the Corrections Ombudsman. 53 (e)ââOmbudsmanâ means the Corrections Ombudsman. 54 (3) The Office of the Corrections Ombudsman is created as a 55 unit of the legislative branch of state government. The office 56 is independent of the Department of Corrections and reports 57 directly to the Legislature. The office shall be headed by the 58 Corrections Ombudsman. The office may hire staff and use 59 volunteers as necessary to perform its duties. The office shall 60 do all of the following: 61 (a)âReceive, track, investigate, and attempt to resolve 62 complaints concerning correctional facilities made by or on 63 behalf of incarcerated persons, supporters of incarcerated 64 persons, and the public. 65 (b)âMonitor and evaluate the conditions of confinement and 66 the treatment of incarcerated persons in correctional 67 facilities. The office may inspect such facilities at any time, 68 but must inspect each facility at least once each year. 69 (c)âCollect and analyze data relating to serious incidents, 70 violence, and deaths that occur in correctional facilities. 71 (d)âMake recommendations to the department and Legislature 72 which identify solutions to systemic problems, as well as policy 73 changes and corrective actions necessary to protect the health, 74 safety, welfare, and rights of incarcerated persons. 75 (e)âProvide information, as appropriate, to incarcerated 76 persons, supporters of incarcerated persons, and the public 77 about the rights of incarcerated persons and the services of the 78 office. 79 (4)âThe Legislature shall appoint the Ombudsman to a 5-year 80 term by a majority vote and may only remove the Ombudsman by a 81 majority vote. The Ombudsman may be reappointed for a 5-year 82 term. The Ombudsman: 83 (a)âMust have knowledge and experience in corrections and 84 human rights. 85 (b)âMay not have worked for the department in the 10 years 86 preceding his or her appointment. 87 (c)âMay not have a family member who has worked for the 88 department in the 10 years preceding his or her appointment. 89 (5)(a)âOn or before January 1, 2027, the Legislature shall 90 establish a Corrections Oversight Committee composed of 15 91 voting members. The committee shall meet quarterly to advise, 92 assist, and provide guidance to the Ombudsman; however, the 93 Ombudsman is not required to accept such advice, assistance, or 94 guidance. 95 (b)âFour members of the Legislature shall be appointed to 96 the committee. The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two 97 members of the Senate who are not members of the same political 98 party, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall 99 appoint two members of the House of Representatives who are not 100 members of the same political party. 101 (c)âThe legislative members appointed pursuant to paragraph 102 (b) shall appoint the remaining 11 members of the committee and 103 must include at least one: 104 1.âLicensed physician. 105 2.âLicensed mental or behavioral health professional. 106 3.âEducator. 107 4.âMember of the clergy. 108 5.âFormer administrative employee of the department. 109 6.âMan who is a citizen of the United States and was 110 formerly incarcerated in a correctional facility for a term of 111 imprisonment of 3 or more years within the 10 years preceding 112 his appointment. 113 7.âWoman who is a citizen of the United States and was 114 formerly incarcerated in a correctional facility for a term of 115 imprisonment of 3 or more years within the 10 years preceding 116 her appointment. 117 8.âFamily member of a person who is incarcerated in a 118 correctional facility at the time of the family memberâs 119 appointment. 120 9.âRepresentative of a nonprofit prisoner advocacy group. 121 10.âPerson with a background in data analysis. 122 11.âPerson with experience in inmate reentry services. 123 (d)âEach committee member shall be appointed to a 3-year 124 term. However, for the purpose of achieving staggered terms, the 125 members initially appointed under subparagraphs (c)6.-11. shall 126 each serve a 2-year term. All subsequent appointments shall be 127 for 3-year terms. Any vacancy must be filled in the same manner 128 as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired 129 term. 130 (6)âThe department shall provide the Ombudsman and 131 committee members with immediate access to correctional 132 facilities, staff members of such facilities, persons 133 incarcerated in such facilities, and records of such facilities 134 which the Ombudsman or committee members determine are needed to 135 carry out the duties of the office. The Ombudsman and committee 136 members may access any correctional facility at any time, 137 unannounced, and speak confidentially with any incarcerated 138 person or staff member. 139 (7)âWritten correspondence between an incarcerated person 140 and the office, including the Ombudsman or a committee member, 141 is privileged mail under rule 33-210.103, Florida Administrative 142 Code. 143 (8)âThe decision, or failure, to file a complaint with the 144 office does not impact the inmate grievance procedure 145 established under s. 944.331. 146 (9)âThe office is not required to investigate every 147 complaint or process complaints in the order received. 148 (10)âBeginning December 1, 2027, the office shall submit an 149 annual report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of 150 the House of Representatives which summarizes the activities, 151 findings, and recommendations of the office. 152 Section 2.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 153 $250,000 in recurring funds is appropriated from the General 154 Revenue Fund to the Office of the Corrections Ombudsman for the 155 purposes of implementing and administering this act. 156 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.